Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16A.1393] STATE-FUNDED SERVICES TO UNDOCUMENTED NONCITIZENS PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, noncitizens of the United States who are undocumented or otherwise not lawfully present in the United States must not receive from any person or entity any service, payment, grant, loan, subsidy, or other form of financial aid or assistance funded by state tax revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.1465, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. The following terms have the meanings given: (1) "eligible student" means a resident student under section 136A.101, subdivision 8, new text begin clauses (1) to (8) or (10), new text end who is enrolled in any public postsecondary educational institution or Tribal college and who meets the eligibility requirements in subdivision 2; (2) "gift aid" includes: (i) all federal financial aid that is not a loan or pursuant to a work-study program; (ii) state financial aid, unless designated for other expenses, that is not a loan or pursuant to a work-study program; (iii) institutional financial aid, including a grant, scholarship, tuition waiver, fellowship stipend, or other payment, unless designated for other expenses, that is not a loan or pursuant to a work-study program; and (iv) all private financial aid that is not a loan or pursuant to a work-study program. Financial aid from the state, public postsecondary educational institutions, and Tribal colleges that is specifically designated for other expenses is not gift aid for purposes of the North Star Promise scholarship. (3) "other expenses" includes books, required supplies, child care, emergency assistance, food, and housing; (4) "public postsecondary educational institution" means an institution operated by this state, or the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota; (5) "recognized cost of attendance" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 20, chapter 28, subchapter IV, part F, section 1087ll; (6) "Tribal college" means a college defined in section 136A.1796, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); and (7) "tuition and fees" means the actual tuition and mandatory fees charged by an institution. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to scholarship awards beginning in the fall term of the 2025-2026 academic year. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.04, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Citizenship requirements. (a) Eligibility for MinnesotaCare is deleted text begin availabledeleted text end new text begin limitednew text end to citizens or nationals of the United Statesdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin andnew text end lawfully present noncitizens as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 155.20deleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end Undocumented noncitizensnew text begin are ineligible for MinnesotaCarenew text end . For purposes of this subdivision, an undocumented noncitizen is an individual who resides in the United States without the approval or acquiescence of the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. Families with children who are citizens or nationals of the United States must cooperate in obtaining satisfactory documentary evidence of citizenship or nationality according to the requirements of the federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, Public Law 109-171. (b) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 and 7, eligible persons include families and individuals who arenew text begin lawfully present andnew text end ineligible for medical assistance by reason of immigration status and who have incomes equal to or less than 200 percent of federal poverty guidelinesdeleted text begin , except that these persons may be eligible for emergency medical assistance under section 256B.06, subdivision 4deleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end